fst/sinmorph.xfst
! sinmorph.xfst

read lexc nouns.lexc
define Nouns;

read lexc verbs.lexc
define Verbs;

! Phonological/orthographic rules
! Emily started here

define VowelShort [ා ැ ෑ ි ී ු ූ ෙ ේ ෛ ො ෝ ෞ];

! when vowel-final lexical base + vowel-initial morpheme, the final vowel of the preceding component is deleted
define VowFinDeletion VowelShort -> 0 || _ %^ VowelShort;

! insert [y] after front vowels, [w] after back vowels, but before a vowel-initial morpheme
define SemiVowelInsertion1 [..] -> ය || [ි | ෙ | ැ] _ [VowelShort | 0] %^;

define SemiVowelInsertion2 [..] -> ව || [ු | ො | [ා] _ [VowelShort | 0] %^;

! ASSIMILATION
! T~D: 't' becomes 'd' before 'd'
define TtoD ත -> ද ||  _ %^ ද;

! K~P: 'k' becomes 'p' before 'p'
define KtoP ක -> ප ||  _ %^ ප;

! K~G: 'k' becomes 'g' before 'g'
define KtoG ක -> ග ||  _ %^ ග;

! W~P: 'w' becomes 'p' after 'p'
define WtoP ව -> ප || ප %^ _;

! W~N: 'w' becomes 'n' after 'n'
define WtoN ව -> න || න %^ _;

! W~D: 'w' becomes 'd' after 'd'
define WtoD ව -> ද || ද %^ _;

! T~L: 't' becomes 'l' before 'l'
define TtoL ත -> ල || _ %^ ල;

! N~M: 'n' becomes 'm' before 'm'
define NtoM න -> ම || _ %^ ම;

! add vowel 'u' or 'a' between 'k_ʈa'
define Epenthesis ක් -> [ක | කු] || _ %^ ට;

# Cleanup 1: Remove ^ (generic morpheme boundary tag)
define Cleanup1 %^ -> 0;

! Emily ended here

regex ( Nouns | Verbs );

save stack sinmorph.fst
